zh-CN: 旋钮样式: 定制; 复古/复古; 带状; 光滑; 标准; 其他
tr: Topuz stili: Özel; Retro/Vintage; Fitilli; Pürüzsüz; Standart; Diğer
pt-BR: Estilo do puxador: Personalizada; Retrô/Vintage; Com nervuras; Suave; Padrão; Outro
sl-SI: Slog gumba: Po meri; Retro/vintage; Rebrast; Gladek; Standarden; Drugo
el: Στυλ κουμπιού: Custom; Ρετρό/Βίντατζ; Ριγέ; Ήπια; Κανονικό; Άλλο
cs: Styl knoflíků: Vlastní; Retro/staré časy; S žebrováním; Hladký; Standardní; Jiné
pt-PT: Estilo do botão: À medida; Retro/vintage; Canelado; Macio; Padrão; Outro
lt-LT: Rankenėlės stilius: Pasirinktinis; Retro / Vintažas; Briaunota; Glotni; Standartinis; Kita
da: Knapstil: Skræddersyet; Retro/vintage; Med riller; Glat; Standard; Andet
ro-RO: Stil buton: Personalizat; Retro/Vintage; Cu nervuri; Neted; Standard; Altele
sk-SK: Štýl tlačidla: Gombík Custom; Retro/Vintage; Rebrovaný; Hladký; Štandardný; Iné
bg-BG: Стил копче: Персонализирано; Ретро/винтидж; Оребрено; Гладко; Стандартно; Други
fr: Style de bouton: Personnalisé; Rétro/Vintage; Nervuré; Lisse; Standard; Autre
en: Knob style: Custom; Retro/Vintage; Ribbed; Smooth; Standard; Other
es: Estilo de perilla: Personalizado; Retro/Vintage; Acanalado; Suave; Estándar; Otros
hr-HR: Stil gumba: Prilagođeno; Retro/vintage; Rebrasti; Glatki; Standardni; Ostalo
nl: Knopstijl: Aangepast; Retro/Vintage; Geribbeld; Glad; Standaard; Andere
th: สไตล์ลูกบิด: ปรับเข้ารูป; เรโทร/วินเทจ; แบบร่อง; เรียบ; มาตรฐาน; อื่นๆ
hu: Fogantyú stílusa: Egyéni; Retró/vintage; Bordázott; Sima; Normál; Egyéb
it: Stile della manopola: Personalizzato; Retro/vintage; A coste; Liscio; Standard; Altro
sv: Knoppstil: Anpassad; Retro/Vintage; Ribbad; Slät; Standard; Övrigt
nb: Knottstil: Tilpasset; Retro/vintage; Med riller; Glatt; Standard; Annet
vi: Kiểu quả đấm cửa: Tùy chỉnh; Phục cổ/Cổ điển; Có gân; Nhẵn; Bánh xe tiêu chuẩn; Khác
de: Stil des Knopfs/Reglers: Maßgeschneidert; Retro/Vintage; Gerippt; Glatt; Standard; Sonstiges
ja: ノブのスタイル: カスタム; レトロ/ヴィンテージ; リブ付き; スムース; スタンダード; その他
ru: Дизайн ручки: Пользовательский; Ретро/винтаж; Ребристый; Гладкий; Стандартный; Другой
ko: 노브 스타일: 커스텀; 레트로/빈티지; 골이 있는; 매끄러운; 표준; 기타
fi: Nupin tyyli: Mukautettu; Retro/Vintage; Joustinneuleinen; Sileä; Tavallinen; Muu
pl: Styl pokrętła: Niestandardowe terminy; Retro/Vintage; Żebrowany; Gładki; Standard; Inne
zh-TW: 旋鈕樣式: 客製化; 復古/復古; 羅紋; 光滑; 標準; 其他